North Dakota, session 69, SB2081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.4-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-24.4-29. Geropsychiatric facilities.
The department may select one or moreskilled nursing homesfacilities within the state to operate a
unit that exclusively provides geropsychiatric services. Admission to one of the skilled nursing
homesfacilities that exclusively provides geropsychiatric services for the purpose of receiving
geropsychiatric services may be granted only after the state hospital has performed an evaluation of the
individual being admitted which indicates the individual is in need of nursing home geropsychiatric
servicesan individual practicing within the scope of their practice determines the individual meets the
criteria for skilled nursing, and needs psychiatric behavioral health services. Admissions from the state
hospital will be given first priority for admission to the units. If at any time the department determines
that the number of approved geropsychiatric units that provide geropsychiatric services in the state is
insufficient to meet the needs, the department may select a geropsychiatric unitadditional units based
on the experience, qualification, and capacity of the skilled nursing homesfacilities that propose to
provide geropsychiatric services. The state hospital may not offer geropsychiatric services through a
unit set up exclusively to provide those services.

S. B. NO. 2081 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2081.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 1 Absent 10
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State